Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1641
Change of ownership; notification.

The owner of any dam subject to the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act shall notify the Chief Water Officer of any change in the ownership of the dam. Notification shall be in such form and include such evidence of ownership as the Chief Water Officer may by rule and regulation require.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 41;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 281.